South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4726.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 5 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 5-3-105. (A) The governing body of a municipality may annex an area by ordinance, provided that for a period of no less than five years, the area has been either: (1) completely surrounded by the municipality; or (2) completely surrounded by the municipality except for the area's border with one or more of the following: (a) a state line; (b) a military installation; (c) a state or national park or forest; or (d) a lake or river. (B) Not less than thirty days before the first reading of an ordinance to annex an area as defined in subsection (A), the municipality shall give notice of a public hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the community, and by written notification to the taxpayer of record for all properties within the area proposed to be annexed.  The public hearing must include: (1) a map of the proposed annexation area; (2) a complete legal description of the proposed annexation area; (3) a statement detailing the public services to be assumed or provided by the municipality; (4) the taxes and fees required for these services; and (5) the projected timetable for the provision or assumption of these services. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----